Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

13-1-1.
Contract defined — Generally.

A contract is an agreement between two or more parties for the doing or not doing of some specified thing.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2676; Code 1868, § 2672; Code 1873, § 2714; Code 1882, § 2714; Civil Code 1895, § 3631; Civil Code 1910, § 4216; Code 1933, § 20-101.

13-1-2.
Contract defined — Executed and executory contracts.

An executed contract is one in which all the parties thereto have performed all the obligations which they have originally assumed.

An executory contract is one in which something remains to be done by one or more parties.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2677; Code 1868, § 2673; Code 1873, § 2715; Code 1882, § 2715; Civil Code 1895, § 3632; Civil Code 1910, § 4217; Code 1933, § 20-102.

13-1-3.
Contract defined — Contract of record.

A contract of record is one which has been declared and adjudicated by a court having jurisdiction or which is entered of record in obedience to or in carrying out the judgment of a court.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2678; Code 1868, § 2674; Code 1873, § 2716; Code 1882, § 2716; Civil Code 1895, § 3633; Civil Code 1910, § 4218; Code 1933, § 20-103.

13-1-4.
Contract defined — Specialty contract.

A specialty is a contract under seal and is considered by the law as entered into with more solemnity, and consequently of higher dignity, than ordinary, simple contracts.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2679; Code 1868, § 2675; Code 1873, § 2717; Code 1882, § 2717; Civil Code 1895, § 3634; Civil Code 1910, § 4219; Code 1933, § 20-104.

13-1-5.
Contract defined — Simple contract.

All other contracts than those specified in Code Sections 13-1-2 through 13-1-4 are termed simple contracts.

Simple contracts may either be in writing or rest only in words as remembered by witnesses.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2680, 2681; Code 1868, §§ 2676, 2677; Code 1873, §§ 2718, 2719; Code 1882, §§ 2718, 2719; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3635, 3636; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4220, 4221; Code 1933, §§ 20-105, 20-106.

13-1-6.
Contract defined — Parol contracts.

Parol contracts shall include only contracts in words as remembered by witnesses.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2681; Code 1868, § 2677; Code 1873, § 2719; Code 1882, § 2719; Civil Code 1895, § 3636; Civil Code 1910, § 4221; Code 1933, § 20-106.

13-1-7.
Contract defined — Absolute and conditional contracts.

A contract may be absolute or conditional. In an absolute contract, every covenant is independent and the breach of one does not relieve the obligation of another. In a conditional contract, the covenants are dependent upon each other and the breach of one is a release of the binding force of all dependent covenants.

The classification of every contract must depend upon a rational interpretation of the intention of the parties.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2683; Code 1868, § 2679; Code 1873, § 2721; Code 1882, § 2721; Civil Code 1895, § 3638; Civil Code 1910, § 4223; Code 1933, § 20-109.

13-1-8.
Contract defined — Entire and severable contracts.

A contract may be either entire or severable. In an entire contract, the whole contract stands or falls together. In a severable contract, the failure of a distinct part does not void the remainder.

The character of the contract in such case is determined by the intention of the parties.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2687; Code 1868, § 2683; Code 1873, § 2725; Code 1882, § 2725; Civil Code 1895, § 3643; Civil Code 1910, § 4228; Code 1933, § 20-112.

Party free to accept performance of remaining part of severable contract although severed portion illegal. —

Where contract is severable, even if there is partial failure of consideration because of illegality, one party to contract may not object if opposite party is willing to accept performance of remaining portions of contract. Jones v. Clark, 147 Ga. App. 657, 249 S.E.2d 619, 1978 Ga. App. LEXIS 2886 (1978).

Mere statement of two accounts does not make defendant debtor of one party alone

where account of each arose out of separate contract for defendant’s services. Oliver v. Hall County Mem. Hosp., 65 Ga. App. 59, 15 S.E.2d 257, 1941 Ga. App. LEXIS 255 (1941).

13-1-9.
Apportionment of entire contracts.

In some cases even an entire contract is apportionable, as where the price to be paid is not fixed, or is by the contract itself apportioned according to time; so, if the failure of one party to perform is caused by the act of the other, the contract may still be apportioned.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2688; Code 1868, § 2684; Code 1873, § 2726; Code 1882, § 2726; Civil Code 1895, § 3644; Civil Code 1910, § 4229; Code 1933, § 20-113.

Section provides exceptions to general rule that entire contracts not apportionable. —

Generally an entire contract, from the contract’s very nature, is not subject to apportionment. It is true that by the terms of this section, provision is made for certain exceptions to the general rule. White v. Sailors, 17 Ga. App. 550, 87 S.E. 831, 1916 Ga. App. LEXIS 774 (1916).

13-1-10.
Licenses and contracts distinguished.

Where, in the exercise of the police power, a license is issued, the license is not a contract but only a permission to enjoy the privilege for the time specified, on the terms stated; and it may be abrogated.

History.
Civil Code 1895, § 15; Civil Code 1910, § 15; Code 1933, § 20-117.

13-1-11.
Validity and enforcement of obligations to pay attorney’s fees upon notes or other evidence of indebtedness.

Obligations to pay attorney’s fees upon any note or other evidence of indebtedness, in addition to the rate of interest specified therein, shall be valid and enforceable and collectable as a part of such debt if such note or other evidence of indebtedness is collected by or through an attorney after maturity, subject to subsection (b) of this Code section and to the following provisions:

If such note or other evidence of indebtedness provides for attorney’s fees in some specific percent of the principal and interest owing thereon, such provision and obligation shall be valid and enforceable up to but not in excess of 15 percent of the principal and interest owing on said note or other evidence of indebtedness;

If such note or other evidence of indebtedness provides for the payment of reasonable attorney’s fees without specifying any specific percent, such provision shall be construed to mean 15 percent of the first $500.00 of principal and interest owing on such note or other evidence of indebtedness and 10 percent of the amount of principal and interest owing thereon in excess of $500.00; and

The holder of the note or other evidence of indebtedness or his or her attorney at law shall, after maturity of the obligation, notify in writing the maker, endorser, or party sought to be held on said obligation that the provisions relative to payment of attorney’s fees in addition to the principal and interest shall be enforced and that such maker, endorser, or party sought to be held on said obligation has ten days from the receipt of such notice to pay the principal and interest without the attorney’s fees. If the maker, endorser, or party sought to be held on any such obligation shall pay the principal and interest in full before the expiration of such time, then the obligation to pay the attorney’s fees shall be void and no court shall enforce the agreement. The refusal of a debtor to accept delivery of the notice specified in this paragraph shall be the equivalent of such notice.

If, in a civil action, application of the provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section will result in an award of attorney’s fees in an amount greater than $20,000.00, the party required to pay such fees may, prior to the entry of judgment, petition the court seeking a determination as to the reasonableness of such attorney’s fees.

In response to a petition filed under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the party requesting the attorney’s fees shall submit an affidavit to the court with evidence of attorney’s fees, and the party required to pay such fees may respond to such affidavit.

The court may hold a hearing to decide the matter of attorney’s fees or may award attorney’s fees based on the written evidence submitted to the court. The amount of attorney’s fees awarded shall be an amount found by the court to be reasonable and necessary for asserting the rights of the party requesting attorney’s fees.

This subsection shall not apply to a party against whom a default judgment is to be entered pursuant to Code Section 9-11-55.

A civil action instituted solely for the purpose of invoking this subsection shall be void ab initio.

Obligations to pay attorney’s fees contained in security deeds and bills of sale to secure debt shall be subject to this Code section where applicable.

The provisions of this Code section shall not authorize the recovery of attorney’s fees in any tort claim.

History.
Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 221, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 3667; Ga. L. 1900, p. 53, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 4252; Code 1933, § 20-506; Ga. L. 1946, p. 761, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 545, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 264, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 317, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 13/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1035, § 1/SB 181.

The 2010 amendment,

effective June 3, 2010, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, in subsection (a), in the introductory language, substituted “collectable” for “collectible”, added “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(2), and substituted “his or her attorney” for “his attorney” in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(3).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, inserted “subsection (b) of this Code section and to” near the end of the introductory language of subsection (a); added present subsection (b); redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c); and added subsection (d). See Editor’s notes for effective date and applicability.

Section applies to all contracts. —

O.C.G.A. §13-1-11 by operation of law constitutes a part of all contracts incorporated in promissory notes, and all such instruments must be construed in the light of this particular section. Anderson v. Hendrix, 175 Ga. App. 720, 334 S.E.2d 697, 1985 Ga. App. LEXIS 2167 (1985).

Section inapplicable in eminent domain proceeding. —

O.C.G.A. §13-1-11 was intended to apply only in default situations where an indebtedness is collected by or through an attorney after maturity, and the provision in a deed that a bank sought to enforce for reasonable attorney fees incurred as the result of an eminent domain proceeding in order to protect the bank’s security interest in the condemned property was not contemplated by the statutory scheme. Boddy Enters., Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 171 Ga. App. 551, 320 S.E.2d 374, 1984 Ga. App. LEXIS 2265 (1984).

Section inapplicable to exclusive listing contract. —

Exclusive listing contract is not a “note or other evidence of indebtedness” within the meaning of subsection (a) of O.C.G.A. §13-1-11. O'Brien's Irish Pub, Inc. v. Gerlew Holdings, Inc., 175 Ga. App. 162, 332 S.E.2d 920, 1985 Ga. App. LEXIS 2047 (1985).

O.C.G.A. §13-1-11 is inapplicable to personal services contracts.

See Holcomb v. Evans, 176 Ga. App. 654, 337 S.E.2d 435, 1985 Ga. App. LEXIS 2534 (1985).

Unpublished decision:

Given the Georgia Supreme Court’s recent guidance on this issue, the district court properly applied O.C.G.A. §13-1-11 in calculating attorneys’ fees. Because the guaranties provided for the payment of reasonable attorney’s fees without specifying any specific percent, the district court correctly concluded that §13-1-11(a)(2) governed in this case. Asma v. Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., 571 Fed. Appx. 848, 2014 U.S. App. LEXIS 13262 (11th Cir. 2014).

A lease

was an “evidence of indebtedness” within the meaning of O.C.G.A. §13-1-11. Holmes v. Bogino, 219 Ga. App. 858, 467 S.E.2d 197, 1996 Ga. App. LEXIS 37 (1996).

Phrase “evidence of indebtedness” in O.C.G.A. §13-1-11 is construed broadly so as to encompass leases. RadioShack Corp. v. Cascade Crossing II, LLC, 282 Ga. 841, 653 S.E.2d 680, 2007 Ga. LEXIS 788 (2007).

Section as part of contract providing for attorney’s fees. —

All contracts to pay attorney’s fees incorporated in promissory notes or other evidences of indebtedness must be construed in light of the statute, which by operation of law constitutes a part of all such contracts. Hall v. Pratt, 103 Ga. 255, 29 S.E. 764, 1898 Ga. LEXIS 104 (1898); Stoner v. Pickett, 115 Ga. 653, 42 S.E. 41, 1902 Ga. LEXIS 512 (1902); Booth v. Rosier, 124 Ga. 154, 52 S.E. 327, 1905 Ga. LEXIS 681 (1905).

A lessor was correct in asserting a right to recover reasonable attorney fees under the lessor’s lease with its lessee as there was no special pleading requirement for the enforcement of such provision, and the lessor prevailed on the lessor’s claim for reimbursement for insurance premiums paid over the life of the lease; thus, the case was remanded for further proceedings as to the amount of reasonable fees the lessor could recover. Ranwal Props., LLC v. John H. Harland Co., 285 Ga. App. 532, 646 S.E.2d 730, 2007 Ga. App. LEXIS 571 (2007).

Section valid. —

Unpublished decision:

Court found no error in the district court’s rejection of the company’s contention that the attorney’s fees provision was an unenforceable penalty; the 15% provisions was permitted under O.C.G.A. §13-1-11, and was not an unenforceable liquidated damages penalty. Branch Banking & Trust Co. v. Lichty Bros. Constr., Inc., 488 Fed. Appx. 430, 2012 U.S. App. LEXIS 18418 (11th Cir. 2012).

Section inapplicable absent preexisting agreement to pay attorney’s fees. —

Like Ga. L. 1935, p. 381, § 2 (see O.C.G.A. §44-14-162), regulating sales under powers in security deeds, former Code 1933, § 20-506 (see O.C.G.A. §13-1-11) did not come into play in absence of preexisting agreement between parties to pay attorney’s fees upon note or other evidence of indebtedness. Global Indus., Inc. v. Harris, 376 F. Supp. 1379, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 8408 (N.D. Ga. 1974).

Promissory notes authorizing attorney fees when note is collected by and through attorney are valid,

enforceable, and collectible. Camacho v. First S. Homeowners Co., 160 Ga. App. 491, 287 S.E.2d 327, 1981 Ga. App. LEXIS 3157 (1981).

Section inapplicable since contract not note or evidence of indebtedness. —

Trial court did not err in awarding attorney fees related to an attorney’s collection efforts because, in the personal services contract at issue, the attorney agreed to perform services for a doctor and the doctor agreed to compensate the attorney for those services; however, the trial court’s default judgment order erroneously awarded attorney fees pursuant to the provisions of O.C.G.A. §13-1-11(a), and because the contract was not a note or other evidence of indebtedness, §13-1-11 was inapplicable. Vaughters v. Outlaw, 293 Ga. App. 620, 668 S.E.2d 13, 2008 Ga. App. LEXIS 1029 (2008).

Stubborn litigiousness in insurance claim.

— In a suit for bad faith,
O.C.G.A. §33-4-6 was the exclusive remedy for bad faith denial of benefits; thus, the insurance company was entitled to summary judgment on any claim for attorney fees for stubborn litigiousness brought under
O.C.G.A. §
13-1-11.
Montgomery v. Travelers Home & Marine Ins. Co., 360 Ga. App. 587, 859 S.E.2d 130, 2021 Ga. App. LEXIS 268 (2021).

Section 506(b) of Bankruptcy Code preempts O.C.G.A. § 13-1-11. —

See First Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. Standard Bldg. Assocs., 85 Bankr. 644, 1988 Bankr. LEXIS 528 (Bankr. N.D. Ga. 1988); Welzel v. Advocate Realty Invs., LLC, 255 F.3d 1266, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 14404 (11th Cir.), vacated, 260 F.3d 1284, 2001 U.S. App. LEXIS 17442 (11th Cir. 2001).

Section affords maker ten days to pay before suit may be filed. —

Law requires that notice give opportunity to maker to pay amount due during period of ten days before expiration of which suit may not be filed. Murdock Acceptance Corp. v. Wagnon, 587 F.2d 764, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 17643 (5th Cir. 1979).

Ga. L. 1967, p. 226, §§ 5 and 6 (see O.C.G.A.9-11-6(e)) was inapplicable to computations of time periods under former Code 1933, § 20-506 (see O.C.G.A. §13-1-11).

Ten-day period required was to be counted from day of receipt. Calvert Fire Ins. Co. v. Environs Dev. Corp., 601 F.2d 851, 1979 U.S. App. LEXIS 12152 (5th Cir. 1979).

Failure to give notice before commencement of action does not preclude recovery of attorneys’ fees.

One In All Corp. v. Fulton Nat'l Bank, 108 Ga. App. 142, 132 S.E.2d 116, 1963 Ga. App. LEXIS 569 (1963); McInvale v. Walter E. Heller & Co., 116 Ga. App. 71, 156 S.E.2d 371, 1967 Ga. App. LEXIS 698 (1967).

13-1-12.
Requirement of proof of endorsement or assignment of bill, bond, or note in action by endorsee.

When an action is brought by an endorsee, an endorsement or assignment of any bill, bond, or note need not be proved unless denied under oath.

History.
Laws 1810, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 271; Code 1863, § 2796; Code 1868, § 2804; Code 1873, § 2855; Code 1882, § 2855; Civil Code 1895, § 3705; Civil Code 1910, § 4299; Code 1933, § 20-805.

Section applicable although endorser’s name signed by agent and action is against maker, not endorser. —

Rule applies though name of endorser purports to have been signed not by endorser but by endorser’s agent or attorney in fact, and though action be not against endorser but against maker. Plea which seems to admit endorsement is not a denial of the endorsement. Habersham v. Lehman, 63 Ga. 380, 1879 Ga. LEXIS 227 (1879).

13-1-13.
Recovery of voluntary payments.

Payments of claims made through ignorance of the law or where all the facts are known and there is no misplaced confidence and no artifice, deception, or fraudulent practice used by the other party are deemed voluntary and cannot be recovered unless made under an urgent and immediate necessity therefor or to release person or property from detention or to prevent an immediate seizure of person or property. Filing a protest at the time of payment does not change the rule prescribed in this Code section.

History.
Civil Code 1895, § 3723; Civil Code 1910, § 4317; Code 1933, § 20-1007.

Section inapplicable where payment induced by misplaced confidence, artifice, deception or fraud of party paid. —

While money voluntarily paid may not ordinarily be recovered back, nevertheless this rule has no application where payment is induced by misplaced confidence, artifice, deception, or fraudulent practice on part of person to whom money is paid. Lowe v. Presley, 86 Ga. App. 328, 71 S.E.2d 730, 1952 Ga. App. LEXIS 947 (1952).

In an action by borrowers claiming that the lender’s charging of an illegal notary fee breached the parties’ loan agreement, the district court erred in concluding that, regardless of whether a breach occurred, O.C.G.A. §13-1-13 barred recovery because Georgia’s Supreme Court, in response to a certified question, concluded that the borrowers had alleged sufficient artifice, deception, or fraudulent practice to trigger an exception to §13-1-13. Anthony v. Am. Gen. Fin. Servs., 626 F.3d 1318, 2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 24446 (11th Cir. 2010).

Section applicable to insurance premiums voluntarily paid by one entitled to waiver thereof. —

Premiums voluntarily paid by insured, where the insured is entitled to waiver thereof under provisions of policies of insurance sued on, cannot be recovered back by insured except where it is alleged and proved by the insured that the payments were paid under a mistake of facts or because of fraud or artifice practiced upon insured. New York Life Ins. Co. v. Williamson, 53 Ga. App. 28, 184 S.E. 755, 1936 Ga. App. LEXIS 4 (1936).

One cannot avoid legal consequences of one’s acts by protesting,

at time one does the acts, that one does not intend to subject oneself to such consequences. Lewis v. Colquitt County, 71 Ga. App. 304, 30 S.E.2d 801, 1944 Ga. App. LEXIS 346 (1944).

Section inapplicable to three-cornered transaction resulting in tort claim. —

O.C.G.A. §13-1-13 does not apply to a three-cornered transaction culminating in a tort claim for damages. Read v. Benedict, 200 Ga. App. 4, 406 S.E.2d 488, 1991 Ga. App. LEXIS 757 (1991).

Section no bar to recovery of premiums not made to satisfy claim. —

In a suit on a contract terminating a business relationship and requiring the defendant to select one of two options regarding an insurance policy, the plaintiff’s recovery of insurance premiums the plaintiff paid was not barred by the voluntary payment doctrine of O.C.G.A. §13-1-13; the plaintiff made premium payments not to satisfy a claim but to keep the policy in effect, and allowing the premium to go unpaid would have defeated the purpose of the parties’ agreement. Hibbard v. McMillan, 284 Ga. App. 753, 645 S.E.2d 356, 2007 Ga. App. LEXIS 400 (2007).

Partial insurance settlement. —

Acceptance of a partial settlement of an insurance claim in exchange for a general release because of ignorance of rights which would have allowed full payment was a voluntary action under O.C.G.A. §13-1-13. Hawkins v. Travelers Ins. Co., 162 Ga. App. 231, 290 S.E.2d 348, 1982 Ga. App. LEXIS 2124 (1982).

13-1-14.
Collection of closing fees for contracts for the advance of money or the extension of credit; refund of closing fees in certain instances; limited application.

In addition to any other charges permitted for the advance of money or for the extension of credit, a lender or seller may collect a closing fee at the time of making a loan or extending credit in order to defray the costs of investigation and verification of a borrower’s or purchaser’s credit reports and references. Such closing fee may be for an amount up to 4 percent of the face amount of the loan or credit extension or total amount of the sales contract but shall not be more than $50.00. Such closing fee may be paid from the proceeds of the amount borrowed or added to the principal amount of the loan or credit extension.

When any loan or sales contract upon which a closing fee has been charged is prepaid in full by any means within 90 days of the date of the loan or sales contract, the lender or seller shall refund or credit the borrower or purchaser with a pro rata portion of the closing fee; provided, however, that in such event, the lender or seller may retain an amount of not more than $25.00 from the collected closing fee.

This Code section shall only apply to installment loans made pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 7, retail installment and home solicitation sales contracts entered into pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 1 of Title 10, and insurance premium finance agreements entered into pursuant to Chapter 22 of Title 33; provided, however, that a closing fee authorized under this Code section shall not constitute interest, a time price differential, a finance charge, or a service charge within the meaning of Code Section 7-3-15, 10-1-4, or 33-22-9.

Nothing contained in Code Section 7-4-18 shall be construed to amend or modify the provisions of this Code section.

“Actual cost” means the amount paid by a third party for the processing of a payment made by electronic means. If a lender or merchant is a subsidiary of an entity that processes payments made by electronic means, the parent entity shall be considered a third party.

“Payment by electronic means” means the remittance of an amount owed through the use of a credit card, debit card, electronic funds transfer, electronic check, or other electronic method.

This Code section shall apply only to loans made pursuant to Chapter 1 of Title 7, installment loans made pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 7, retail installment and home solicitation sales contracts entered into pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 1 of Title 10, motor vehicle sales financing contracts entered into pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 1 of Title 10, and insurance premium finance agreements entered into pursuant to Chapter 22 of Title 33; provided, however, that a convenience fee authorized under this Code section shall not constitute interest, an additional charge, a time price differential, a finance charge, or a service charge within the meaning of Code Section 7-3-12, 10-1-4, 10-1-33, or 33-22-9.

Nothing contained in Code Section 7-4-18 shall be construed to amend or modify the provisions of this Code section.

“Health spa” means an establishment which provides, as one of its primary purposes, services or facilities which are purported to assist patrons to improve their physical condition or appearance through change in weight, weight control, treatment, dieting, or exercise. Such term includes an establishment designated as a “reducing salon,” “health spa,” “spa,” “exercise gym,” “health studio,” or “health club,” or by other terms of similar import.

“Service member” means an active duty member of the regular or reserve component of the armed forces of the United States, the Georgia National Guard, or the Georgia Air National Guard on ordered federal duty for a period of 90 days or longer.

History.
Code 1981, §13-1-14, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 30, § 1/SB 139; Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 8/SB 462.

13-1-15.
Convenience fee; when appropriate.

As used in this Code section, the term:

In addition to any other charges, interest, and fees permitted by law and subject to the terms and conditions of the debit card or credit card acceptance agreement, a lender or merchant may collect a nonrefundable convenience fee from any person electing to utilize an option of payment by electronic means. Such convenience fee shall be in an amount that represents the actual cost to a lender or merchant; provided, however, that in lieu of the actual cost, a lender or merchant is authorized to collect a convenience fee which does not exceed the average of the actual cost incurred for a specific type of payment made by electronic means for which such lender or merchant imposes a convenience fee.

No convenience fee shall be charged unless a lender or merchant also provides a direct payment option by check, cash, or money order in which no convenience fee is imposed.

Any lender or merchant imposing a convenience fee as provided for in this Code section shall provide clear disclosure of such fee prior to imposition. Such notice shall include the dollar amount of such fee, a statement that such fee is nonrefundable, and a statement that such fee is charged for payment by electronic means.

History.
Code 1981, §13-1-15, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 931, § 1/HB 299; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 27/HB 143; Ga. L. 2020, p. 156, § 8/SB 462.

13-1-16.
Additional contracts terminable by service members; requirements.

As used in this Code section, the term:

In addition to the contractual relief provided for under Code Sections 10-4-214, 44-7-22, and 46-5-8, and in furtherance of the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. Section 3901 et seq., any service member may terminate a contract pursuant to this Code section if such contract is for:

The provision of television, video, or audio programming or internet access; or

Membership or provision of services by a health spa, notwithstanding any provisions of Code Section 10-1-393.2.

Termination of a contract pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall be effective only if the service member receives military orders to relocate for a period of service of at least 90 days to a location that does not support the contract.

In terminating a contract pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the service member shall provide the other contractual party with a written or electronic notice of termination to be effective on the date stated in the notice. Such notice shall be accompanied by either a copy of the official military orders or a written verification signed by the service member’s commanding officer indicating the relocation.

The provisions of this Code section shall apply to all contracts, and a renewal, modification, or extension of any contract, provided for under subsection (b) of this Code section and entered into on or after July 1, 2019. The provisions of this Code section may not be waived or modified by the agreement of the parties under any circumstances.

History.
Code 1981, §13-1-16, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 145, § 2/HB 25.